Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-269
School lands; Dawes County; transfer to Game and Parks Commission.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds is authorized and directed to sell section thirty-six, township thirty-two north, range forty-nine, west of the sixth principal meridian, Dawes County, Nebraska, reserving mineral, oil, and gas rights, to the Game and Parks Commission on payment of forty thousand dollars. All mineral extraction and exploration on such land shall be conducted in a manner approved by both the Board of Educational Lands and Funds and the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 1967, c. 463, § 1, p. 1434.